New York, session 2025-2026, A8621.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subject to the provisions of this act, the village of Kings 2 Point, acting by and through its governing body and upon such terms and 3 conditions as determined by such board is hereby authorized to discon- 4 tinue as parklands and alienate the lands described in section three of 5 this act for the purpose of providing additional parking for the commu- 6 nity center being built by the United Mashadi Jewish Community of Ameri- 7 ca. 8 § 2. The authorization provided in section one of this act shall be 9 effective only upon the condition that the village of Kings Point dedi- 10 cates the lands described in section four of this act as parkland 11 provided that the village of Kings Point has never used such lands for 12 public open space or park purposes. 13 § 3. The parklands authorized by section one of this act to be alien- 14 ated consist of 2.4817 acres and are described as follows: 15 All that certain plot, piece or parcel of land, situate, lying and 16 being at the Incorporated Village of Kings Point, Town of North Hemp- 17 stead, County of Nassau, and State of New York, more particularly bound- 18 ed and described as follows: 19 BEGINNING at a point on the northeasterly line of Steamboat Road 20 distant 355.39 feet southeasterly from the intersection of the south- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11999-02-5 A. 8621--A 2 1 easterly line of Hewlett Place with the northeasterly line of Steamboat 2 Road; 3 THENCE along the southeasterly line of Tax Lot 2 and Tax Lot 1 a/k/a 4 Kings Point Park N 41°28'05"E, a distance of 319.02 feet to a point; 5 THENCE along the northeasterly line of Tax Lots 2, 3 & 5 and the 6 aforementioned lands of Kings Point Park N 49°19'40"W, a distance of 7 283.37 feet to the southeasterly line of 'Map of Kings Point Estates, 8 Filed Map #2910'; 9 THENCE along the southeasterly and northeasterly line of Kings Point 10 Estates and lands of Kings Point Park, the following four (4) courses 11 and distances: 12 1) N 41°44'00"E, a distance of 5.96 feet to a point; 13 2) N 46°37'58"W, a distance of 189.42 feet to a point; 14 3) N 46°12'58"W, a distance of 147.80 feet to a point; 15 4) N 49°12'58"W, a distance of 44.93 feet to a point; 16 THENCE passing through Tax Lot 1 a/k/a Kings Point Park, the following 17 ten (10) courses and distances: 18 1) N 43°06'23"E, a distance of 110.36 feet to a point; 19 2) S 46°11'11"E, a distance of 193.58 feet to a point; 20 3) S 46°47'04"E, a distance of 37.80 feet to a point; 21 4) S 48°49'00"E, a distance of 218.97 feet to a point; 22 5) S 40°40'29"W, a distance of 38.00 feet to a point; 23 6) S 49°19'31"E, a distance of 166.98 feet to a point; 24 7) N 40°40'22"E, a distance of 38.00 feet to a point; 25 8) S 49°17'58"E, a distance of 133.79 feet to a point; 26 9) S 41°28'05"W, a distance of 416.86 feet to a point; 27 10) S 58°16'57"W, a distance of 30.00 feet, to the aforementioned 28 northeasterly line of Steamboat Road; 29 THENCE along said line of Steamboat Road N 43°59'00"W, a distance of 30 80.41 feet to the point or place of BEGINNING, containing 108,102 square 31 feet or 2.4817 acres, more or less. 32 § 4. Prior to the discontinuance and alienation of the parkland 33 described in section three of this act, the village of Kings Point shall 34 dedicate as parkland such land consisting of 5.76 acres described as 35 follows: 36 AS TO LOT 21 37 ALL that certain plot, piece or parcel of land, situate, lying and 38 being in the Incorporated Village of Kings Point, Town of Hempstead, 39 County of Nassau and State of New York, being bounded and more partic- 40 ularly described as follows: 41 BEGINNING at a point on the easterly side of Middle Neck Road, where 42 the same is intersected by the southerly line of lands formerly the 43 Alker Estate, now or formerly Youssian, being the southwest corner of 44 Lot 40 in Section and Block 164; 45 RUNNING THENCE the following three (3) courses: 46 1. Along the southerly line of lands now or formerly Youssian North 89 47 degrees 26 minutes 35 seconds East 509.84 feet to a point; 48 2. THENCE South 00 degrees 33 minutes 25 seconds East 160.06 feet; 49 THENCE South 89 degrees 26 minutes 35 seconds West 536.19 feet to the 50 easterly side of Middle Neck Road; 51 THENCE along the easterly side of Middle Neck Road North 08 degrees 47 52 minutes 30 seconds East 162.22 feet to the point or place of BEGINNING. 53 AS TO LOT 22 54 ALL that certain plot, piece or parcel of land, situate, lying and 55 being in the Incorporated Village of Kings Point, Town of Hempstead, A. 8621--A 3 1 County of Nassau and State of New York, being bounded and more partic- 2 ularly described as follows: 3 BEGINNING at a point on the easterly side of Middle Neck Road 162.22 4 feet southerly where Middle Neck Road is intersected by the southerly 5 line of lands formerly the Alker Estate, now or formerly Youssian, being 6 the southwest corner of Lot 40 in Section 1 and Block 164; 7 RUNNING THENCE the following three (3) courses: 8 1. Along the common line of Parcels 1 and 2, North 89 degrees 26 9 minutes 35 seconds East, 536.19 feet to a point; 10 2. THENCE South 00 degrees 33 minutes 25 seconds East, 160.00 feet; 11 3. THENCE South 89 degrees 26 minutes 35 seconds West, 529.74 feet to 12 the easterly side of Middle Neck Road; 13 THENCE along the easterly side of Middle Neck Road North 03 degrees 24 14 minutes 10 seconds West 153.19 feet; 15 THENCE North 08 degrees 47 minutes 30 seconds East 7.09 feet to the 16 point or place of BEGINNING. 17 AS TO LOT 23 18 ALL that certain plot, piece or parcel of land, situate, lying and 19 being in the Incorporated Village of Kings Point, Town of Hempstead, 20 County of Nassau and State of New York, being bounded and more partic- 21 ularly described as follows: 22 BEGINNING at a point on the easterly side of Middle Neck Road, 322.50 23 feet southerly where Middle Neck Road is intersected by the southerly 24 line of lands formerly the Alker Estate, now or formerly Youssian, being 25 the southwest corner of Lot 40 in Section and Block 164; 26 RUNNING THENCE the following nine (9) courses: 27 1. Along the common line of Parcels 2 and 3, North 89 degrees 26 28 minutes 35 seconds East 529.74 feet to a point; 29 2. THENCE South 00 degrees 33 minutes 25 seconds East 140.36 feet; 30 3. THENCE South 89 degrees 26 minutes 50 seconds West 137.57 feet; 31 4. THENCE North 13 degrees 55 minutes 10 seconds West 4.25 feet; 32 5. THENCE South 82 degrees 06 minutes 15 seconds West 21.02 feet; 33 6. THENCE South 02 degrees 21 minutes 50 seconds East 3.15 feet; 34 7. THENCE South 84 degrees 59 minutes 50 seconds West, 63.39 feet; 35 8. THENCE South 80 degrees 29 minutes 50 seconds West 150.45 feet; 36 THENCE South 78 degrees 45 minutes 50 seconds West 139.49 feet to the 37 easterly side of Middle Neck Road; 38 THENCE along the easterly side of Middle Neck Road, North 18 degrees 39 05 minutes 50 seconds West 16.95 feet; 40 THENCE North 08 degrees 30 minutes 10 seconds West 83.99 feet; 41 THENCE North 03 degrees 24 minutes 10 seconds West 96.99 feet to the 42 point or place of BEGINNING. 43 § 5. In the event that the fair market value of the parklands 44 described in section four of this act to be dedicated by the village of 45 Kings Point pursuant to this act are not equal to or greater than the 46 fair market value of the parklands to be alienated as described in 47 section three of this act, the village of Kings Point shall dedicate the 48 difference of the fair market value of the lands to be alienated and the 49 lands to be dedicated for the acquisition of additional parklands and/or 50 capital improvements to existing park and recreational facilities. 51 § 6. In the event that the village of Kings Point received any funding 52 support or assistance from the federal government for the purchase, 53 maintenance or improvement of the parklands set forth in section three 54 of this act, the discontinuance and alienation of such parkland author- 55 ized by the provisions of this act shall not occur until the village of 56 Kings Point has complied with any federal requirements pertaining to the A. 8621--A 4 1 alienation or conversion of parklands, including satisfying the secre- 2 tary of the interior that the alienation or conversion complies with all 3 conditions which the secretary of the interior deems necessary to assure 4 the substitution of other lands shall be equivalent in fair market value 5 and usefulness to the lands being alienated or converted. 6 § 7. This act shall take effect immediately.